North Carolina, session 2025, SB139.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Subsections (c) and (d) of Section 35.21 of S.L. 2017-57 are
repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective retroactively to December 31, 2020.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
State Treasurer the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to address the increased cost to the North Carolina State Health
Plan for Teachers and State Employees as a result of the continuation of retiree medical members
under this act.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S139-v-1*